Washington statutes.
RCW 4.32.070

Objection may be taken by answer.

When any of the matters enumerated in *RCW 4.32.050 do not appear upon the face of the complaint, the objection may be taken by answer.

[Code 1881 s 79; 1877 p 18 s 79; 1854 p 139 s 42; RRS s 261.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 4.32.050 was repealed by 1984 c 76 s 11.